apertium-scn.scn.dix
    <pardef n="d/ari__vblex">
      	<e><p><l>ari</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>are</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>àri</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      	<e><p><l>ari</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
      	<e r="LR"><p><l>àri</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__battiri"/></e>
        
    	<e><p><l>ugnu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>uni</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ai</l><r>ari<s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>una</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>a</l><r>ari<s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>amu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ati</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>annu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>unanu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ùnanu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	<e><p><l>avu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>avi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ava</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>àvamu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>àvavu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>àvanu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	<e><p><l>esi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>asti</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>esi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>èttimu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ècimu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>àstivu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>astivu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>èssiru</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>èttiru</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>èttiri</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	<e><p><l>una</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ugna</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>assi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>amu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ati</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>àssiru</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>assiru</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    
    	<e><p><l>ùna</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ùgna</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>àssi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>àmu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e><p><l>àti</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e><p><l>àssiru</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
        
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>una</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ugna</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìviti"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>assi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>amu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__parràmuni"/></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>ati</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrìvivi"/></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>assiru</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__scrivennu"/></e>
    
    	 <!-- Imperfecto de Indicativo -->
    	<e><p><l>ava</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>avu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>avi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ava</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>àvamu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>àvavu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>àvanu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	<e r="LR"><p><l>avamu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>avavu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>avanu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        
    	 <!-- Futuro Simple -->
    	<e><p><l>arò</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>arrò</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>arai</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>arrai</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>arà</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>arrà</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>aremu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>arremu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>ariti</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>arriti</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>arannu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>arrannu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    	 <!-- Presente de Subjuntivo falta en Siciliano -->

    	 <!-- Pretérito de Subjuntivo -->
        <e><p><l>assi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>assi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>assi</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>àssimu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e><p><l>àssivu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>àssiru</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>assimu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    	<e r="LR"><p><l>assivu</l><r>ari<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="dari"><i>d</i><par n="d/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dari" r="LR"><p><l>dun</l><r>d</r></p><par n="d/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rari"><i>r</i><par n="d/ari__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ridari"><par n="ri/re"/><i>d</i><par n="d/ari__vblex"/></e>
